District of Columbia statutes.
8-115.03

Repealed

Prohibition on lead-based paint activities.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-221, § 4, 43 DCR 6854
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-347, § 2(c), 52 DCR 2627
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 21(a), 56 DCR 1596
1981 Ed., § 6-997.3.